Louisiana, session 2026, HB305.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:81.1(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§81.1. Child sexual abuse materials
* * *
F.(1)(2) Upon the filing of any information or indictment by the prosecuting
authority for a violation of this Section, the investigating law enforcement agency
which that seized the photographs, films, videotapes, or other visual reproductions
of child sexual abuse materials shall provide copies of those reproductions to the
Internet crimes against children division within the attorney general's office.
(3) Upon receipt of the reproductions as provided in Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection, the Internet crimes against children division shall do all of the following:
(a) Provide those visual reproductions to the law enforcement agency
representative assigned to the Child Victim Identification Program at the National
Center for Missing and Exploited Children.
(b) Request the Child Victim Identification Program to provide the law
enforcement agency contact information for any visual reproductions recovered
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 305 ENROLLED
which that contain an identified victim of child sexual abuse materials as defined in
this Section.
(c) Provide case information to the Child Victim Identification Program, as
requested by the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children guidelines, in
any case where the Internet crimes against children division within the attorney
general's office identifies a previously unidentified victim of child sexual abuse
materials submitted to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children when
visual reproductions are recovered that contain child sexual abuse materials as
defined in this Section.
(d) In any case that involves the production of newly created child sexual
abuse materials, the investigating law enforcement agency shall provide the case
information and visual reproductions to the Child Victim Identification Program, as
requested by the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children guidelines.
(4) (2) The Internet crimes against children division investigating law
enforcement agency shall submit to the designated prosecutor the law enforcement
agency contact information provided by the Child Victim Identification Program at
the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children to the designated prosecutor,
for any visual reproductions involved in the case which that contain the depiction of
an identified victim of child sexual abuse materials as defined in this Section.
(5) (3) In all cases in which the prosecuting authority has filed an indictment
or information for a violation of this Section and the victim of child sexual abuse
materials has been identified and is a resident of this state, the prosecuting agency
investigating law enforcement agency shall submit all of the following information
to the attorney general for entry into the Louisiana Attorney General's Exploited
Children's Identification database maintained by that office Child Victim
Identification Program at the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children:
(a) The parish, district, and docket number or agency file number of the case.
(b) The name, race, sex, and date of birth of the defendant.
(c) The identity of the victim Biographical information associated with the
victim.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 305 ENROLLED
(d) The contact information for the law enforcement agency which that
identified a victim of child sexual abuse materials, including contact information
maintained by the Child Victim Identification Program and provided to the Internet
crimes against children division in accordance with this Section.
(6) (4) No sentence, plea, conviction, or other final disposition shall be
invalidated due to failure to comply with the provisions of this Subsection, and no
person shall have a cause of action against the investigating law enforcement agency
or any prosecuting authority, or officer or agent thereof for failure to comply with
the provisions of this Subsection.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.